Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.140

Purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to afford protection to the public including all persons, firms, and corporations furnishing labor, materials, or equipment to a contractor from unreliable, fraudulent, financially irresponsible, or incompetent contractors.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 21; 1973 1st ex.s. c 161 s 2.]